Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-726
Reports.

Each licensed
mortgage banker, registrant, and installment loan company shall submit to
the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry mortgage reports of condition, which shall be
in such form and shall contain such information as the department may require.

Laws 2009, LB328, § 11;

Laws 2010, LB892, § 10.